Massachusetts, session 194th, S2079.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary there shall be a
refundable credit for the costs associated with operating a motor vehicle for the purposes of
commuting for employment, education, medical appointments, or service on behalf of a qualified
charitable organization as defined under 26 U.S. Code § 170 (C). The amount of the credit shall
be 58.5 cents per mile driven and shall not exceed $5,000 per filing.
SECTION 2. SECTION 1 shall go into effect January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. SECTION 1 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. SECTION 3 shall go into effect January 1, 2026.
of 1